South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3851.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-5015(H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (H) The provisions of this section do not apply to: (1) a motor vehicle registered in this State in the name of a person, or the person's legal guardian, who has an affidavit signed by a physician or an optometrist licensed to practice in this State that states that the person has a physical condition that makes it necessary to equip the motor vehicle with sunscreening material which would be of a light transmittance or luminous reflectance in violation of this section. The affidavit must be in the vehicle at all times during its operation and must be produced at the request of a law enforcement officer. The affidavit must be updated every two years; or (2) a law enforcement vehicle used regularly to transport a canine trained for law enforcement purposes. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----